Indiana, session 2026, HB1034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-5-40.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.24-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40.7. (a) As used in this section, "instructional
time" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-30-2-1. "school day" means
the entirety of the time a student is present on school property for
a student instructional day (as defined in IC 20-30-2-2).
(b) As used in this section, "wireless communication device" means
any portable wireless device that has the capability to provide voice,
messaging, or other data communication between two (2) or more
parties, including a:
(1) cellular telephone;
(2) tablet computer;
(3) laptop computer; or
(4) gaming device; or
(5) smartwatch that is connected to a cellular telephone, a cell
tower, or the Internet.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), each school corporation
2026 IN 1034—LS 6167/DI 143


and charter school shall adopt and implement a wireless
communication device policy that:
(1) except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) and subsection
(d), subdivision (2), prohibits a student from using or possessing
a wireless communication device during instructional time; the
school day;
(2) authorizes a teacher to allow a student to use a wireless
communication device for educational purposes during
instructional time; and
(3) permits a student to use a wireless communication device in
the event of an emergency or to manage the student's health care.
(2) requires teacher directed use of a wireless communication
device for educational purposes during the school day to
occur only on school supplied wireless communication
devices; and
(3) mandates one (1) of the following policies:
(A) A no device policy under which students are not
permitted to bring wireless communication devices to
school.
(B) A secure storage policy under which wireless
communication devices may be brought to school, but must
be:
(i) stored and inaccessible throughout the school day;
and
(ii) returned to the student upon dismissal at the end of
the school day.
(d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection (c) may
not prohibit a student from using a wireless communication device
during instructional time the school day if the use of the wireless
communication device is: included in the student's:
(1) included in the student's individualized education program;
or
(2) included in the student's plan developed under Section 504
of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794;
(3) necessary for the management of a documented medical
condition pursuant to a physician's directive;
(4) authorized by the superintendent, or the superintendent's
designee, during an emergency; or
(5) necessary for language translation to ensure access for
multi-lingual learners, prioritizing school-managed wireless
communication devices or applications where available.
(e) Each school corporation and charter school shall publish on its
2026 IN 1034—LS 6167/DI 143


website the wireless communication device policy established under
subsection (c).
(f) The department shall publish model policy language and
implementation guidance consistent with this section.
2026 IN 1034—LS 6167/DI 143